Montana, session 2025, HB456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 52-2-714, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-714. Best beginnings child care scholarship program. There is a best beginnings child care
scholarship program administered by the department. The program is established to provide scholarships to
qualified low-income families and eligible child-care workers employed at a licensed day-care center or
registered family or group day-care home whose child received care provided by a licensed or registered child
care child-care provider or day-care facility."
Section 2. Section 52-2-715, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-715. Family income eligibility -- child-care worker eligibility -- requirements. (1) In Except
as provided in subsection (2), in determining income eligibility for qualified low-income families for the best
beginnings child care scholarship program, the department shall:
(1)(a) set a qualifying income threshold at no less than 185% of the federal poverty level for each
family size; and
(2)(b) set a maximum qualifying income level that is no higher than that allowed by the federal child
care and development block grant.
(2) A child-care worker is eligible for the best beginnings child care scholarship program if the
worker:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 456
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 456
(a) is employed at a licensed day-care center or registered family or group day-care home for at
least the minimum number of hours required as established by the department pursuant to 45 CFR 98.16(g) ;
and
(b) has a household income that is less than two times the state median income.
"
Section 3. Appropriation. There is appropriated $5.5 million from the general fund to the department
of public health and human services for each year of the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes of
providing best beginnings child care scholarships to eligible child-care workers as provided in [section 1].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 456
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 456, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 456
INTRODUCED BY J. KARLEN, J. REAVIS, L. MUSZKIEWICZ, B. EDWARDS, J. ISALY, M. LEE, P. STRAND,
J. SECKINGER, B. CLOSE, P. ELVERUM, S. FYANT, J. WEBER, A. GRIFFITH, M. CUNNINGHAM, D. BAUM,
B. CARTER, J. COHENOUR, C. KEOGH, E. STAFMAN, D. JOY
AN ACT EXPANDING THE BEST BEGINNINGS CHILD CARE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM TO PROVIDE
SCHOLARSHIPS TO CHILD-CARE WORKERS EMPLOYED BY A LICENSED DAY-CARE CENTER OR
REGISTERED FAMILY OR GROUP DAY-CARE HOME; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AMENDING
SECTIONS 52-2-714 AND 52-2-715, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”